Utah statutes.
32A-12-505 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Lawful transportation.

Nothing contained in Section 32A-12-504 prohibits any carrier from:

(1)  transporting alcoholic products in the course of export from the state; or

(2)  transporting alcoholic products across any part of this state while in transit pursuant to a bona fide consignment of the alcoholic products to a person outside of this state.

